Hawaii statutes.
[§481R-5] Financial security requirements.
(a) To ensure the adequate performance of a warrantor's obligations to a
consumer, each warrantor shall comply with financial security requirements by
insuring each vehicle protection product warranty issued by the warrantor under
a reimbursement insurance policy issued by an insurer authorized to engage in
the business of insurance in this State or under a surplus lines insurance
policy issued by an insurer eligible to place coverage in this State as regulated
under the insurance laws of this State.

(b) The department may not require any other
financial security requirements or financial standards for warrantors.
Warrantors shall not be subject to any other financial security requirements
under state law. [L 2002, c 237, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next